Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-512
Museums; property; exempt from execution and taxation.

The property of any public museum, including the museum property of a contracting party set forth in a contract with a city or village for the use of a museum already established, shall be exempt from execution and taxation, as is other public property.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 12, p. 771;

Laws 1989, LB 444, § 4.